Washington statutes.
RCW 42.20.040

False report.

Every public officer who shall knowingly make any false or misleading statement in any official report or statement, under circumstances not otherwise prohibited by law, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 98; RRS s 2350.]